Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4902
Policy.

It is the policy of this state to make revisions in its statutory structure if this will encourage both new and existing businesses to relocate to and expand in Nebraska and to provide appropriate inducements to encourage them to do so if this will aid in the economic and population growth of the state and help create better jobs for the citizens of the State of Nebraska and if this can be done in a fiscally sound and effective manner.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 2.